Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB119.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-145 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 8-145. (a) All registration and certificates of title fees shall be
paid to the division of vehicles, a contractor of the division or the county
treasurer of the county in which the applicant for registration resides or has
an office or principal place of business within this state. The division,
contractor or the county treasurer shall issue a receipt to the applicant for
such fees paid.
(b) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall deposit $.75
$5.75 out of each license application, $.75 out of each application for
transfer of license plate and $2 $3.50 out of each application for a
certificate of title, collected under this act, in a special fund, which fund is
hereby appropriated for the use of the county treasurer, division or
contractor in paying for necessary help and expenses incidental to the
administration of duties in accordance with the provisions of this law. The
county treasurer shall receive extra compensation for the services
performed in administering the provisions of this act, which compensation
shall be in addition to any other compensation provided by any other law,
except that the county treasurer shall receive as additional compensation
for administering the motor vehicle title and registration laws and fees, a
sum computed as follows: The county treasurer, during the month of
December, shall determine the amount to be retained for extra
compensation not to exceed the following amounts each year for calendar
year 2006 or any calendar year thereafter: The sum of $110 per hundred
registrations for the first 5,000 registrations; the sum of $90 per hundred
registrations for the second 5,000 registrations; the sum of $5 per hundred
for the third 5,000 registrations; and the sum of $2 per hundred
registrations for all registrations thereafter. In no event, however, shall any
county treasurer be entitled to receive more than $15,000 additional annual
compensation.

SB 119 2
If more than one person shall hold the office of county treasurer during
any one calendar year, such compensation shall be prorated among such
persons in proportion to the number of weeks served. The total amount of
compensation paid the treasurer together with the amounts expended in
paying for other necessary help and expenses incidental to the
administration of the duties of the county treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of this act, shall not exceed the amount deposited in such
special fund. Any balance remaining in such fund at the close of any
calendar year shall be withdrawn and credited to the general fund of the
county prior to June 1 of the following calendar year.
(c) The county treasurer, division or contractor shall remit the
remainder of all such fees collected, together with the original copy of all
applications, to the secretary of revenue. The secretary of revenue shall
remit all such fees remitted to the state treasurer in accordance with the
provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of
each such remittance, the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in
the state treasury to the credit of the state highway fund, except as
provided in subsection (d).
(d) (1) Three dollars and fifty cents of each certificate of title fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway patrol
motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each certificate of title fee collected
and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund.
(2) For repossessed vehicles, $3 of each certificate of title fee
collected shall be retained by the contractor or county treasurer who
processed the application.
(3) Three dollars and fifty cents of each reassignment form fee
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $3.50 to the Kansas highway patrol
motor vehicle fund. Three dollars of each reassignment form fee collected
and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer who shall credit such $3 to the VIPS/CAMA technology
hardware fund.
(4) Four dollars of each division of vehicles modernization surcharge
collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be remitted to the
state treasurer who shall credit such $4 to the state highway fund.
(5) Two dollars of each Kansas highway patrol staffing and training
surcharge collected and remitted to the secretary of revenue, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer who shall credit such $2 to the Kansas
highway patrol staffing and training fund.
(6) One dollar and twenty-five cents of each surcharge collected and

SB 119 3
remitted to the secretary of revenue pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,177, and
amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the state treasurer who shall
credit such $1.25 to the state general fund.
(7) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for commercial motor vehicles or
vehicles that are part of a commercial fleet, shall be remitted to the state
treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the commercial vehicle
administrative fund.
(8) Fees collected in K.S.A. 8-135 and 8-145, and amendments
thereto, that are collected by the division for vehicles that are part of a fleet
rental pursuant to K.S.A. 8-1,189, and amendments thereto, shall be
remitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such amounts to the fleet
rental vehicle administration fund.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-145 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.